Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.030

Penalty.

A person who willfully violates any provision of this title regarding the conduct of mail ballot primaries or elections is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2103; 2001 c 241 s 21. Formerly RCW 29.38.070.]